North Dakota statutes. TITLE 36 Livestock
CHAPTER 36-13 Estrays [Repealed]

[Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8]

Effective Date.

The repeal of this chapter by section 8 of chapter 72, S.L. 2013 became effective July 1, 2013.

Note.

See now N.D.C.C. ch. 4.1-75, Estrays.

36-13-01.
Estrays — Possession. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-13-02.
Estrays — Notification of chief brand inspector. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-13-03.
Sale of unclaimed estray — Records. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 287, § 24.

Note.

Section 24 of chapter 287, S.L. 2003, repealed this section effective July 1, 2003.

36-13-03.1.
Alternate disposition of estray. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-13-04.
Claiming estrays. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-13-05.
Lawful charges. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-13-06.
Liability for failure to give proper notice. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-13-07.
Liability for death, theft, or escape of estray. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.

36-13-08.
Taking up estray — Compliance with chapter — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2013, ch. 72, § 8.